Utah statutes.
26-23-10.   Religious exemptions from code -- Regulation of state-licensed
healing system practice unaffected by code.
(1) Nothing in this code shall be construed to compel any person to submit to
any medical or dental examination or treatment under the authority of this
code when such person, or the parent or guardian of any such person objects to
such examination or treatment on religious grounds, or to permit any
discrimination against such person on account of such objection; provided,
that exemption from medical or dental examination shall not be granted if the
executive director has reasonable cause to suspect a substantial menace to the
health of other persons exposed to contact with the unexamined person.
(2)  Nothing in this code shall be construed as authorizing the supervision,
regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents in any
home or institution conducted for those who rely upon treatment by prayer or
spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well recognized
church or religious denomination, provided the statutes and regulations on
sanitation are complied with.
(3)  Nothing in this code shall be construed or used to amend any statute now
in force pertaining to the scope of practice of any state-licensed healing
system.
